Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1302
Concealing the death of another person; penalty.

Any person who conceals the death of another person and thereby prevents a determination of the cause or circumstances of death commits a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 286.